Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 5
HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR
PERSONS WITH HEALTH COMPLEXES RELATED TO
ACQUIRED IMMUNE DEFICIENCY SYNDROME

25.5-6-501 to 25.5-6-508. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part repealed, (SB 18-093), ch. 62, p. 610, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This part 5 was added in 2006. For amendments to this part 5 prior to its repeal in 2018, consult the 2017 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-093, see section 1 of chapter 62, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.